Maine, session 132, LD1223.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3149 is enacted to read:
§3149. Procurement and arrearage management program funding
1. Procurement costs to be paid from General Fund. Notwithstanding any
provision of this Title to the contrary, if the commission requires a transmission and
distribution utility to purchase or otherwise contract for energy, renewable energy credits,
energy storage systems or transmission infrastructure pursuant to applicable law, costs
incurred by a transmission and distribution utility for the purchase or contract may not be
incorporated into rates, and costs associated with the purchase or procurement must be paid
from the General Fund. The commission may not require a transmission and distribution
utility to purchase or otherwise contract for energy, renewable energy credits, energy
storage systems or transmission infrastructure unless the commission has submitted
legislation to request funding to be paid into the Energy Procurement and Arrearage
Management Program Cost Fund established in subsection 2 and adequate funding is
available within the fund.
2. Energy Procurement and Arrearage Management Program Cost Fund. The
Energy Procurement and Arrearage Management Program Cost Fund is established within
the commission as a nonlapsing fund for the purposes of paying costs incurred by a
transmission and distribution utility to purchase or otherwise contract for energy,
renewable energy credits, energy storage systems or transmission infrastructure pursuant
to applicable law as described in subsection 1 and costs incurred by a transmission and
distribution utility associated with an arrearage management program pursuant to section
3214, subsection 2-A. The commission may receive and deposit in the fund funds from the
General Fund.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§1, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. "Kilowatt-hour credit program cost" means:
(1) Transmission and distribution costs that would otherwise be paid by a customer
through the volumetric charge on the customer's electricity bill that are not received
by a transmission and distribution utility due to application of kilowatt-hour credits
to the customer's electricity bill; and
(2) Costs incurred by a transmission and distribution utility for the administration
of net energy billing arrangements.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Kilowatt-hour credit program costs. After January 1, 2027, kilowatt-hour credit
program costs may not be included or incorporated in the operating expenses of a
transmission and distribution utility to be recovered in rates and must be paid from the
General Fund. The commission shall submit legislation to request funding to be paid into
the Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund established in section 3209-B, subsection
10 to ensure that adequate funding is available to pay kilowatt-hour credit program costs.
The commission shall adopt rules to establish a process by which kilowatt-hour credit
program costs are distributed to transmission and distribution utilities using funds from the
Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund. The rules must require a transmission and
distribution utility to provide to the commission, at least biennially, an estimate of kilowatt-
Page 1 - 132LR1905(01)

414 hour credit program costs for the following year. The commission rules must establish a
425 schedule for the commission's payment of kilowatt-hour program costs and a reconciliation
436 process by which any overpayments are returned by a transmission and distribution utility
447 to the Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of this
458 section to the contrary, rules adopted by the commission pursuant to this subsection are
469 routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§1, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. "Commercial and institutional program cost" means:
(1) The dollar amount of bill credits paid to a customer based on the tariff rates
established under subsection 5; and
(2) Costs incurred by a transmission and distribution utility for the administration
of the program.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§1, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. "Monetized benefit" means revenue received by a transmission and distribution
utility that is generated by the sale of:
(1) Electricity produced by a distributed generation resource participating in the
program; and
(2) Capacity rights associated with a distributed generation resource participating
in the program.
Sec. 6. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Commercial and institutional program costs. After January 1, 2027, commercial
and institutional program costs may not be included or incorporated in the operating
expenses of a transmission and distribution utility to be recovered in rates and must be paid
from the General Fund. The commission shall submit legislation to request funding to be
paid into the Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund established in subsection 10 to
ensure that adequate funding is available to pay commercial and institutional program
costs.
The commission shall adopt rules to establish a process by which commercial and
institutional program costs, less monetized benefits, are distributed to transmission and
distribution utilities and distributed generation resources, as applicable, using funds from
the Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund. The rules must require a transmission and
distribution utility to provide, at least biennially, to the commission an estimate of
commercial and institutional program costs for the following year, as well as an estimate
of monetized benefits. The commission rules must establish a schedule for the
commission's payment of commercial and institutional program costs and a reconciliation
process by which any overpayments are returned by a transmission and distribution utility
to the Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund. Rules adopted by the commission
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 7. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund. The Net Energy Billing Cost
Stabilization Fund is established within the commission as a nonlapsing fund for the
Page 2 - 132LR1905(01)

413 purposes of paying kilowatt-hour credit program costs in accordance with section 3209-A,
424 subsection 10 and commercial and institutional program costs, less monetized benefits, as
435 described in subsection 9. The commission may receive and deposit in the fund funds from
446 the General Fund and any overpayments returned by transmission and distribution utilities
457 in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.
Sec. 8. 35-A MRSA §3212, sub-§1, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. Implementation of time-of-use rates for residential and small commercial
customers located in the service area of a transmission and distribution utility with the
necessary electric billing and metering services to accommodate time-of-use rates;
Sec. 9. 35-A MRSA §3212, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Time-of-use rates; electric billing and metering service necessary. The
commission shall require a transmission and distribution utility, other than a consumer-
owned transmission and distribution utility that does not choose one or more standard-offer
service providers for its territory, to establish electric billing and metering services
necessary to accommodate time-of-use rates for standard-offer service for residential and
small commercial customers.
Sec. 10. 35-A MRSA §3212, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Assistance program participants; standard-offer service required.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an electricity customer enrolled in
an assistance program may not purchase generation service from a competitive electricity
provider and must be enrolled in standard-offer service. For the purposes of this subsection,
"assistance program" means:
A. Low-income assistance provided by the commission in accordance with section
3214, subsection 2;
B. An arrearage management program established pursuant to section 3214, subsection
2-A;
C. Assistance provided from the Electric Assistance Program Fund established under
Title 30-A, section 4962, subsection 1;
D. The statewide Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program administered by the
Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with Title 22, section 3104,
subsection 1, paragraph A;
E. The Women, Infants and Children Special Supplemental Food Program of the
federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966 administered by the Department of Health and
Human Services in accordance with Title 22, section 3107;
F. The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program administered by the
Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with Title 22, section 3762,
subsection 3;
G. The Additional Support for People in Retraining and Employment - Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families program administered by the Department of Health and
Human Services in accordance with Title 22, section 3781-A, subsection 2; or
H. A general assistance program administered by a municipality pursuant to Title 22,
section 4301, subsection 5.
Page 3 - 132LR1905(01)

Sec. 11. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 201, §1; c. 230,
§2; c. 306, §§2 and 3; and c. 361, §§3 to 5, is further amended to read:
2. Low-income assistance. In order to continue existing levels of financial assistance
for low-income households and to meet future increases in need caused by economic
exigencies, the commission shall:
A. Receive funds collected by all transmission and distribution utilities in the State at
a rate set by the commission in periodic rate cases;
A-1. Receive funds collected by the commission for alternative compliance payments
in accordance with section 3210, subsection 9, paragraph B; and
A-2. Receive funds appropriated from the General Fund;
B. Set initial funding for programs based on an assessment of aggregate customer need
in periodic rate cases. The funding formula may not result in assistance being counted
as income or as a resource in other means-tested assistance programs for low-income
households. To the extent possible, assistance must be provided in a manner most
likely to prevent the loss of other federal assistance; and
C. Receive funds remitted by transmission and distribution utilities with net energy
billing arrangements for expired kilowatt‑hour credits in accordance with section
3209‑A, subsection 8.
The commission may use funds available under this subsection to provide financial
assistance to low-income households in emergency situations as determined by the
commission in a proceeding or by rule. Except as provided in paragraphs A-1 and C, the
commission may not provide financial assistance to low-income households pursuant to
this subsection unless the funds for that assistance are appropriated from the General Fund
for the purpose of providing that assistance.
The commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted under this
subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 12. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 534, §§1 to 3,
is further amended to read:
2-A. Arrearage management program. Each investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility shall implement pursuant to this subsection an arrearage management
program to assist eligible low-income residential customers who are in arrears on their
electricity bills. An arrearage management program implemented pursuant to this
subsection is a plan under which a transmission and distribution utility works with an
eligible low-income residential customer to establish an affordable payment plan and
provide credit to that customer toward the customer's accumulated arrears as long as that
customer remains in compliance with the terms of the program. If a consumer-owned
transmission and distribution utility elects to implement an arrearage management
program, it must do so in accordance with this subsection and rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection. All reasonable costs incurred by a transmission and distribution utility,
including, but not limited to, incremental costs, reconnection fees, administrative costs,
marketing costs, costs for any 3rd-party assistance received by the transmission and
distribution utility in administering its arrearage management program and costs for
providing financial and budgetary guidance to participants whether provided directly or
Page 4 - 132LR1905(01)

414 through a 3rd party contracted by the transmission and distribution utility to provide that
425 guidance, must be paid from the Energy Procurement and Arrearage Management Program
436 Cost Fund established in section 3149, subsection 2. The commission shall submit
447 legislation to request funding to be paid into the Energy Procurement and Arrearage
458 Management Program Cost Fund to ensure that adequate funding is available to pay
469 reasonable costs incurred by a transmission and distribution utility in administering its
570 arrearage management program. The amount of any arrearage forgiven that is treated as
581 bad debt for purposes of cost recovery by the transmission and distribution utility may not
592 be included as a reasonable cost. The commission shall establish requirements relating to
1503 the arrearage management programs by rule. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
1514 routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
In adopting rules regarding arrearage management programs, the commission shall:
A. Consider best practices as developed and implemented in other states or regions;
B. Require that an arrearage management program include an electricity usage
assessment at no cost to the participant;
D. Ensure that a transmission and distribution utility develops terms and conditions
for its arrearage management program in a manner that is consistent with the program's
objectives and is in the best interests of all ratepayers; and
D-1. Ensure that if a transmission and distribution utility produces any materials, either
written or electronic, regarding the arrearage management program offered by the
utility, those materials must state in plainly worded language and in a type size that is
no less than 12 points that state law requires the utility to offer an arrearage
management program to its customers and that costs described in paragraph E are not
paid for by the utility; and.
E. Ensure that a transmission and distribution utility recovers in rates all reasonable
costs of arrearage management programs, including:
(1) Incremental costs;
(2) Reconnection fees;
(3) Administrative costs;
(4) Marketing costs;
(5) Costs for any 3rd-party assistance it receives in administering its arrearage
management program; and
(6) Costs for providing financial and budgetary guidance to participants whether
provided directly or through a 3rd party contracted by the transmission and
distribution utility to provide that guidance.
The amount of any arrearage forgiven that is treated as bad debt for purposes of cost
recovery by the transmission and distribution utility may not be included as a
reasonable cost under this paragraph.
The Efficiency Maine Trust shall work with investor-owned transmission and distribution
utilities, consumer-owned transmission and distribution utilities that elect to participate in
an arrearage management program and other stakeholders to provide access to a
Page 5 - 132LR1905(01)

412 complementary low-income energy efficiency program for participants in arrearage
423 management programs in order to help reduce participants' energy consumption.
No later than January 28, 2028, the commission shall prepare a report assessing the
effectiveness of arrearage management programs from October 1, 2024 through September
30, 2027, including the number of participants enrolled in the programs, the number of
participants completing the programs, the number of participants who have failed to
complete the programs, the dollar amount of arrears forgiven, the impact on any
participating transmission and distribution utility's bad debt as a result of the programs, the
costs and benefits to all ratepayers associated with the programs and recommendations for
ways in which the programs might be improved or continued for the benefit of all
ratepayers. In preparing its report, the commission shall hold at least one formal
stakeholder meeting involving affected parties, including the Office of the Public Advocate
and the participating transmission and distribution utilities. Parties must also be provided
an opportunity to submit written comments to the commission regarding the performance
of the programs.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over utilities matters
may report out a bill relating to the commission report to the Second Regular Session of
the 133rd Legislature.
This subsection is repealed September 30, 2028.
Sec. 13. 36 MRSA §656, sub-§1, ¶L, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 682, §5, is
amended to read:
L. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025, solar energy equipment
that generates heat or electricity if the municipality in which the solar energy equipment
is located approves the exemption and:
(1) All of the energy is used on the site where the property is located;
(2) The equipment is collocated with a net energy billing customer that is or net
energy billing customers that are subscribed to at least 50% of the facility's output;
or
(3) All of the energy is transmitted through the facilities of a transmission and
distribution utility and a utility customer or customers receive a utility bill credit
for the energy generated by the equipment pursuant to Title 35‑A, section 3209‑A
or 3209‑B and the generator of electricity entered into a fully executed
interconnection agreement with a transmission and distribution utility prior to June
1, 2024.
On or before April 1st of the first property tax year for which a taxpayer claims an
exemption under this paragraph, the taxpayer claiming the exemption shall file a report
with the assessor. The report must identify the property for which the exemption is
claimed and must be made on a form prescribed by the State Tax Assessor or a
substitute form approved by the State Tax Assessor. The State Tax Assessor shall
furnish copies of the form to each municipality in the State and make the forms
available to taxpayers.
Sec. 14. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§17, as amended by PL 2013, c. 546, §9, is further
amended to read:
Page 6 - 132LR1905(01)

17. Tangible personal property. "Tangible personal property" means personal
property that may be seen, weighed, measured, felt, touched or in any other manner
perceived by the senses, but does not include rights and credits, insurance policies, bills of
exchange, stocks and bonds and similar evidences of indebtedness or ownership. "Tangible
personal property" includes electricity other than electricity consumed by residential
customers and small commercial customers as defined in Title 35-A, section 3106,
subsection 1, paragraphs C and D, respectively. "Tangible personal property" includes any
computer software that is not a custom computer software program. "Tangible personal
property" includes any product transferred electronically.